Washington statutes.
RCW 11.48.060

May recover for embezzled or alienated property of decedent.

If any person, before the granting of letters testamentary or of administration, shall embezzle or alienate any of the moneys, goods, chattels, or effects of any deceased person, he or she shall stand chargeable, and be liable to the personal representative of the estate, in the value of the property so embezzled or alienated, together with any damage occasioned thereby, to be recovered for the benefit of the estate.

[ 2010 c 8 s 2035; 1965 c 145 s 11.48.060. Prior: 1917 c 156 s 101; RRS s 1471; prior: Code 1881 s 1455; 1854 p 278 s 67.]

NOTES:

Larceny: RCW 9A.56.100.